California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (h), when a motor vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, except for a recreational vehicle that is either truck-mounted, permanently towable on the highways without a permit or a park trailer, as these terms are used in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, is sold at retail by a dealer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, the dealer shall pay the applicable sales
 tax and any applicable use tax due under the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) to the Department of Motor Vehicles acting for and on behalf of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Sections 4456 and 4750.6 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) The amendments to this subdivision made by Section 11 of Chapter 256 of the Statutes of 2021 do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.

(b) If the dealer makes an application to the Department of Motor Vehicles that is not timely, and is subject to penalty because of delinquency in effecting registration or transfer of registration of the vehicle, the dealer shall also be liable for penalty as specified in Section 6591, but no interest shall accrue.

(c) (1) Application to the Department of Motor Vehicles by
 the dealer shall be deemed a return filed with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6451) of Chapter 5 with respect to amounts reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subdivision (a).

(A) An application submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles that is deemed a filed return pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated as filed on the date the application is submitted.

(B) An application submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles that is deemed a filed return pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of
 this part.

(2) The amendments made to this subdivision by the act adding this paragraph shall apply to sales reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles for reporting periods beginning on and after January 1, 2021.

(d) (1) If the dealer fails to make an application to the Department of Motor Vehicles, fails to pay the amount of sales or use tax due, or fails to timely file a return with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under Section 6452, interest and penalties shall apply with respect to the unpaid amount as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6451).

(2) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision do
 not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following shall apply:

(1) “Dealer” shall not include a franchisee as defined in Section 331.1 of the Vehicle Code, a franchisee of a recreational vehicle franchise as defined in Section 331.3, a manufacturer or remanufacturer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, an automobile dismantler holding a license and certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, or a lessor-retailer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11600) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code, and subject to the provisions of Section 11615.5 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) “Newly licensed
 dealer” means a dealer who was originally licensed by the Department of Motor Vehicles on or after January 1, 2019.

(f) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall, through the adoption of regulations, establish any additional requirements for the implementation of this section.

(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), this section shall apply to sales of vehicles occurring on and after January 1, 2021.

(2) Based upon operational needs to effectively enforce the collection of taxes pursuant to this section, the Department of Motor Vehicles may establish the following compliance schedule for this section:

(A) Newly licensed dealers, dealers whose seller’s permit was reinstated within the last two years, and dealers with a previous finding of
 underreporting within the last two years shall comply beginning January 1, 2021.

(B) Except as provided in paragraph (3), all other dealers shall comply by January 1, 2023.

(3) Based upon operational needs to effectively enforce the collection of taxes pursuant to this section, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, in consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles, may delay the compliance schedule set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) to no later than January 1, 2026, for dealers that made more than 300 retail vehicle sales in the previous calendar year and are not subject to the compliance schedule set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(h) (1) The California Department
 of Tax and Fee Administration, in consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles, may exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a) any dealer, including any dealer that has paid the applicable sales tax and any applicable use tax due to the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subdivision (a) prior to the operative date of the act adding this subdivision, if the dealer sold 1,000 or more vehicles at retail in the current or preceding calendar year and the dealer’s account is in good standing with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(2) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may revoke the exemption provided by this subdivision after 30 days following the date the department provides notice to the dealer that either of the following has occurred:

(A) The dealer is no longer in good standing.

(B) The dealer’s retail vehicle sales drop below 1,000 vehicles in any calendar year beginning on or after the operative date of the act adding this subdivision.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “good standing” means that the dealer has timely filed and remitted applicable payments, including applicable prepayments, for all required sales and use tax returns for the 12 quarterly reporting periods immediately preceding the issuance of the exemption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 2.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Exemptions [6351. - 6423.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Exemptions [6351. - 6380.]

6351.

“Exempted from the taxes imposed by this part,” as used in this article, means, in case of the sales tax, exempted from the computation of the amount of tax imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6352.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this State of tangible personal property the gross receipts from the sale of which, or the storage, use, or other consumption of which, this State is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or laws of the United States or under the Constitution of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

6353.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts derived from the sales, furnishing, or service of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, all of the following:

(a) Gas, electricity, and water, including steam and geothermal steam, brines, and heat, when delivered to consumers through mains, lines, or pipes.

(b) (1) Liquefied petroleum gas, delivered to a qualified residence by the seller, that is sold for household use in the qualified residence, or liquefied petroleum gas that is purchased for use by a qualified person to be used in producing and harvesting agricultural products; provided, in either case, the liquefied petroleum gas is delivered into a tank with a storage capacity for liquefied petroleum gas that is equal to or greater than 30 gallons. This subdivision may not be construed to provide any exemption from any tax levied by a city, county, or city and county pursuant to Section 7284.3, or any successor to that section.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Qualified residence” means a primary residence, not serviced by gas mains and pipes.

(B) “Qualified person”
 means any person engaged in a line of business described in Codes 0111 to 0291, inclusive, of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 Edition, and any other person that assists that person in the lines of business described in this paragraph in producing and harvesting agricultural products.

(c) Water, when sold to an individual in bulk quantities of 50 gallons or more, for general household use in his or her residence if the residence is located in an area not serviced by mains, lines, or pipes.

(d) Exhaust steam, waste steam, heat, or resultant energy, produced in connection with cogeneration technology, as defined in Section 25134 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) The exemptions provided by subdivision (b) shall be effective starting
 September 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 6.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6354.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sales of commemorative “California Gold” medallions produced and sold in accordance with Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 7551) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of commemorative “California Gold” medallions so produced and sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1095, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

6355.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in bulk of monetized bullion, nonmonetized gold or silver bullion, and numismatic coins that are substantially equivalent to transactions in securities or commodities through a national securities or commodities exchange and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of monetized bullion, nonmonetized gold or silver bullion, and numismatic coins so sold.

(b) (1) A sale in bulk, for purposes of this section, shall be deemed to have occurred if the amount of monetized bullion, nonmonetized gold or silver bullion, and numismatic coins sold in the transaction totals, in
 market value, the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more, or its equivalent.

(2) The department shall adjust the one-thousand-dollar ($1,000) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:

(A) On or before September 1, 1994, and on or before each October 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall multiply the amount applicable for the current calendar year by the inflation factor adjustment determined by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 17041, the resulting amount to be the applicable amount for the succeeding calendar year. The applicable amount shall be
 operative as an adjustment of the amount specified in paragraph (1) only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (C).

(B) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (C), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of five hundred dollars ($500), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning January 1 of the succeeding calendar year.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least five hundred dollars ($500), the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B) as the operative adjustment to the amount
 specified in paragraph (1).

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the following shall apply:

(A) The January 1, 2023, increase in the operative threshold pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be operative July 1, 2023.

(B) Beginning on or after January 1, 2024, increases in the operative threshold pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be operative the first day of the second calendar quarter beginning after the effective date of amendments incorporating the increase in the operative threshold into the department’s regulations. 

(c) “Monetized bullion,” for purposes of this section, means coins or other forms of money manufactured of gold, silver, or other metal and heretofore, now,
 or hereafter used as a medium of exchange under the laws of this state, the United States, or any foreign nation. “Monetized bullion,” for purposes of this section, also means gold medallions struck under authority of the American Arts Gold Medallion Act (Title IV of Public Law 95-630).

(d) A sale of monetized bullion, nonmonetized gold or silver bullion, or numismatic coins, for purposes of this section, shall be deemed to be substantially equivalent to a transaction in securities or commodities through a national securities or commodities exchange, if the sale is by or through a person registered pursuant to the Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 1 et seq.) or not required to be registered under the Commodity Exchange Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 1.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6356.

There are exempted from the sales tax the gross receipts from sales of vessels of more than 1,000 tons burden by the builders thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 591, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

6356.5.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage and use of, or other consumption in this state of, farm equipment and machinery, and the parts thereof, purchased for use by a qualified person to be used primarily in producing and harvesting agricultural products.

(b) For purposes of this section, both of the following shall
 apply:

(1) “Qualified person” means any person engaged in a line of business described in Codes 0111 to 0291, inclusive, of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 Edition, and any other person that uses farm equipment and machinery to assist this person in the lines of business described in this paragraph in producing and harvesting agricultural products.

(2) “Farm equipment and machinery” means implements of husbandry, as defined in Section 411.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section does not apply with
 respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2, or pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(d) The exemption provided by this section shall be effective starting September 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 7.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6356.6.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage and use of, or other consumption in this state of, equipment and machinery designed primarily for off-road use in commercial timber harvesting operations, and the parts thereof, that is purchased for use by a qualified person to be used primarily in harvesting timber.

(b) The State
 Board of Equalization may adopt emergency regulations to specify equipment and machinery exempted by this section, and may revise those regulations from time to time.

(c) For purposes of this section, “qualified person” means any person engaged in commercial timber harvesting.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant
 to Section 6051.2 and 6201.2, or pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(e) The exemption provided by this section shall be effective starting September 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 8.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of motor vehicle fuel used in propelling aircraft, except aircraft jet fuel, the distributions of which in this state are subject to the tax imposed by Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) of this division and not subject to refund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.1.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, diesel fuel used in farming activities and food processing. This section shall be implemented as soon as possible, but in no case later than September 1, 2001.

(b) For purposes of this section, “farming activities” has the same meaning as “farming business” as set forth in Section 263A of the Internal
 Revenue Code. “Farming activities” also includes the transportation and delivery of farm products to the marketplace.

(c) The exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to either of the following:

(1) A tax imposed under the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)).

(2) A tax imposed under Section 6051.2 or 6201.2, or under Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 156, Sec. 6.   Effective August 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.3.

(a) On and after July 1, 2011, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by Sections 6051.8 and 6201.8, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of both of the following:

(1) Diesel fuel purchased for use or used in a manner that is exempt from the tax imposed pursuant to Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001) of Division 2 and not subject to the
 backup tax imposed by Section 60058 or the payment requirement specified in Section 60108.

(2) Diesel fuel subject to the payment requirement specified in Section 60502.2.

(b) No exemption from the tax imposed pursuant to Sections 6051.8 and 6201.8 shall be allowed under this section unless the purchaser furnishes the seller with an exemption certificate, completed in accordance with any instructions or regulations as the board may prescribe.

(c) If a purchaser certifies in writing to the seller that the diesel fuel purchased without payment of the tax imposed pursuant to Section 6051.8 or 6201.8 will be used in a manner entitling the seller to regard the gross receipts or sales price from the sale as exempt from that tax, and uses the diesel fuel in a manner that subjects the diesel fuel to the tax imposed pursuant
 to Section 60050, the purchaser shall be liable for payment of the sales tax imposed pursuant to Section 6051.8, with applicable interest, as if the purchaser were a retailer making a retail sale of the diesel fuel at the time the fuel is so used, and the sales price of the diesel fuel to the purchaser shall be deemed the gross receipts from that retail sale.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 6, Sec. 17.   (AB 105)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.5.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption of, fuel and petroleum products sold to an air common carrier for immediate consumption or shipment in the conduct of its business as an air common carrier, on an international flight.

(b) To qualify for the exemption, the air common carrier shall furnish to the seller an exemption
 certificate in writing stating the quantity of fuel and petroleum products claimed as exempt. That certificate shall bear the purchaser’s valid seller’s permit number or valid fuel exemption registration number and shall be substantially in the form prescribed by the board. Acceptance in good faith of that certificate shall relieve the seller from liability for the sales tax.

(c) “Immediate consumption or shipment,” as used in this section, means that the delivery of the fuel and petroleum products by the seller is directly into an aircraft for consumption or transportation on an international flight and not for storage by the purchaser or any third party.

(d) “International flight,” as used in this section, is a flight whose final destination is a point outside of the United States.

(e) Any air common carrier
 claiming exemption under this section who is not required to hold a valid seller’s permit, shall be required to register with the board and obtain a fuel exemption registration number, and shall be required to file returns as the board may prescribe, either if the board notifies the carrier that returns must be filed or if the carrier is liable for taxes based upon consumption or transportation of fuel or petroleum products erroneously claimed as exempt under this section. A common carrier required to hold a fuel exemption registration number shall be subject to all applicable provisions of this part, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(f) An air common carrier claiming an exemption under this section upon request, shall make available to the board records, including, but not limited to, a copy of a log abstract, an air waybill, or a cargo manifest, documenting its consumption or transportation
 of the fuel or petroleum products on an international flight and the amount claimed as exempt. If the carrier fails to provide these records upon request, the board may revoke the carrier’s fuel exemption registration number.

(g) The board may require any air common carrier claiming an exemption under this section and required to obtain a fuel exemption registration number, to place with it such security as the board may determine pursuant to Section 6701.

(h) Pursuant to this section, any use of the fuel and petroleum products by the purchasing carrier, other than that incident to the delivery of the fuel and petroleum products to the carrier and the consumption or transportation of the fuel and petroleum products by the carrier on an international flight for use in the conduct of its business as a common carrier, or a failure of the carrier to document its consumption or
 transportation of the fuel and petroleum products on an international flight, shall subject the carrier to liability for payment of sales tax as if it were a retailer making a retail sale of the property at the time of that use or failure, and the sales price of the property to it shall be deemed to be the gross receipts from the retail sale.

(i) In the event that the federal exemption provided in Section 1309 of Title 19 of the United States Code, relating to supplies for certain vessels and aircraft, is repealed, this section is repealed as of that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 905, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 1992.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 905.   Repealed conditionally by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6357.7.

(a) On and after July 1, 2010, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, motor vehicle fuel, as defined in Section 7326.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section
 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section shall not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.

(2) The exemption established by this section shall not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Section 6051.2, 6051.5, 6201.2, or 6201.5, or pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(c) On and after July 1, 2010, the State Board of Equalization and the Department of Finance shall recognize that the state no longer receives state sales and use tax revenues from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption of, motor vehicle fuel for purposes of any estimates required to be performed under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7102, and Section
 7104.2.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 6, Sec. 19.   (AB 105)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6358.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:

(a) Any form of animal life the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption.

(b) Feed for any form of animal life the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption or are to be sold in the regular
 course of business.

(c) Seeds and plants the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption or are to be sold in the regular course of business.

(d) Fertilizer to be applied to land the products of which are to be used as food for human consumption or are to be sold in the regular course of business.

(e) On or after January 1, 1997, drugs or medicines, including oxygen, the primary purpose of which is the prevention or control of disease, that are administered to animal life the products of which ordinarily constitute food for human consumption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.   Effective September 1, 1999.   Operative January 1, 2000, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 289.)
-------------------------------------------

6358.1.

(a) There are exempted from taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of either of the following:

(1) Organic products grown expressly for fuel purposes.

(2) Waste byproducts from agricultural or forest products operations, municipal refuse, or manufacturing which are used in an industrial facility as a fuel source in lieu of the use of either oil,
 natural gas, or coal.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), the exemption under this section shall include the use of still gas produced in the refining process from purchased crude oil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   Effective July 3, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

6358.2.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of wood shavings, sawdust, rice hulls, or other products that are used as litter in poultry and egg production and that are ultimately resold as, or incorporated into, fertilizer products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 199.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6358.4.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, drugs or medicines administered to animal life as an additive to feed or drinking water, the primary purpose of which is the prevention and control of disease of food animals, or of nonfood animals which are to be sold in the regular course of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.   Effective October 5, 1995.   Operative April 1, 1996, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------

6358.5.

(a) (1) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, any racehorse breeding stock.

(2) For purposes of this section “racehorse breeding stock” means a horse that is capable of reproduction and for which the purchaser states that it is the purchaser’s
 sole intent to use the horse for breeding purposes.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.

(2) The exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to either Section 6051.2 or 6201.2, or pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(c) The exemption provided by this section shall be effective starting September 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 727, Sec. 9.   (AB 242)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, food products for human consumption.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “food products” includes all of the following:

(1) Cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine, meat and meat products, fish and fish products, eggs and egg products, vegetables and vegetable products, fruit and fruit products, spices and salt, sugar and sugar products, candy, gum, confectionery, coffee and coffee substitutes, tea, and cocoa and cocoa
 products.

(2) Milk and milk products, milkshakes, malted milks, and any other similar type beverages that are composed at least in part of milk or a milk product and that require the use of milk or a milk product in their preparation.

(3) All fruit juices, vegetable juices, and other beverages, whether liquid or frozen, including bottled water, but excluding spirituous, malt, or vinous liquors or carbonated beverages.

(c) For purposes of this section, “food products” does not include any of the following:

(1) Medicines, including medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products, as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and
 Professions Code, and preparations in liquid, powdered, granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form sold as dietary supplements or adjuncts.

(2) Cannabis, as defined in Section 11018 of the Health and Safety Code, and cannabis products, as defined in Section 11018.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) This addition of this subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(d) None of the exemptions in this section apply to any of the following:

(1) When the food products are served as meals on or off the premises of the retailer.

(2) When the food products
 are furnished, prepared, or served for consumption at tables, chairs, or counters or from trays, glasses, dishes, or other tableware whether provided by the retailer or by a person with whom the retailer contracts to furnish, prepare, or serve food products to others.

(3) When the food products are ordinarily sold for immediate consumption on or near a location at which parking facilities are provided primarily for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased at the location, even though those products are sold on a “take out” or “to go” order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the premises of the retailer.

(4) When the food products are sold for consumption within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission charge, except for national
 and state parks and monuments, marinas, campgrounds, and recreational vehicle parks.

(5) When the food products are sold through a vending machine.

(6) When the food products sold are furnished in a form suitable for consumption on the seller’s premises, and both of the following apply:

(A) Over 80 percent of the seller’s gross receipts are from the sale of food products.

(B) Over 80 percent of the seller’s retail sales of food products are sales subject to tax pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (7).

(7) When the food products are sold as hot prepared food products.

(e) “Hot prepared food products,” for the purposes of paragraph (7) of subdivision (d), include a combination of hot and cold food items or components where a single price has been established for the combination and the food products are sold in combination, such as a hot meal, a hot specialty dish or serving, a hot sandwich, or a hot pizza, including any cold components or side items. Paragraph (7) of subdivision (d) does not apply to a sale for a separate price of bakery goods or beverages (other than bouillon, consommé, or soup), or where the food product is purchased cold or frozen; “hot prepared food products” means those products, items, or components that have been prepared for sale in a heated condition and that are sold at any temperature that is higher than the air temperature of the room or place where they are sold.

(f) Notwithstanding paragraph (6) of subdivision (d), if the seller elects to separately account for sales of food products specified in subdivision (b), then the gross receipts from the sale of those food products shall be exempt under subdivision (a), provided that the separate accounting is fully documented in the seller’s records. However, if the seller’s records do not reflect the separate accounting of the gross receipts from sales of nontaxable food products, the seller’s election under this subdivision shall be revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 12.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 3, 1992, by initiative Prop. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.1.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of, and storage, use, or other consumption in this state, of hot prepared food products sold by caterers, or other vendors, to air carriers engaged in interstate or foreign commerce for consumption by passengers on such air carriers, and the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use or other consumption of hot prepared food products sold or served to passengers by air carriers engaged in interstate or foreign commerce for consumption by passengers on such air carriers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.2.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 6359.4, 6359.45, 6363, and 6370, for the year beginning on January 1, 1988, and ending on December 31, 1988, 77 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale at retail of food products shall be subject to the tax imposed by Section 6051, when those food products are actually sold through a vending machine.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 6359.4, 6359.45, 6363, and 6370, for the year beginning on January 1, 1989, and ending on December 31, 1989, 55
 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale at retail of food products shall be subject to the tax imposed by Section 6051, when those food products are actually sold through a vending machine.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 6359.4, 6359.45, 6363, and 6370, for the year beginning on January 1, 1990, and thereafter, 33 percent of the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale at retail of food products shall be subject to the tax imposed by Section 6051, when those food products are actually sold through a vending machine.

(d) (1) The Legislature finds that 33 percent represents the statewide average of food products sold through vending machines which are subject to the tax imposed under this part. Therefore, the Legislature establishes this average as the measure of the tax with respect to vending machine sales to simplify tax
 auditing procedures and to provide for uniformity in the taxation of gross receipts derived from the sale of food products through vending machines.

(2) The Legislature also finds that due to fiscal constraints, it is necessary to phase in the partial exemption for sales made through vending machines in the 1988 and 1989 calendar years.

(e) For purposes of this section, “food products” includes hot coffee, hot tea, and hot chocolate, when those hot beverages are actually sold through a vending machine for a separate price. “Food products” does not include other hot prepared food products, as defined in Section 6359.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1029, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.3.

Any nonprofit veterans’ organization is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to flags of the United States of America which it sells, where the profits are used solely and exclusively in furtherance of the purposes of the nonprofit organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1741.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.4.

(a) Any vending machine operator is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer of, food products which sell at retail for fifteen cents ($0.15) or less and which are actually sold through a vending machine.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any vending machine operator is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer of, food products, other than beverages or hot prepared food products, which are sold through a coin-operated bulk vending machine if
 the amount of each sale is twenty-five cents ($0.25) or less. For purposes of this subdivision, “bulk vending machine” means a vending machine containing unsorted food products, other than beverages or hot prepared food products which, upon insertion of a coin, dispenses those food products, including candy and confectionery, in approximately equal portions, at random, and without selection by the customer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.45.

(a) Any vending machine operator which is a nonprofit, charitable, or educational organization is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer of, tangible personal property which sells at retail for fifteen cents ($0.15) or less and which is actually sold through a vending machine.

(b) Any library district, municipal library, or county library and any vendor making sales pursuant to a contract with a library district, municipal library, or county library is a consumer of, and shall
 not be considered a retailer of, photocopies which it sells at retail and which are actually sold through a coin-operated copy machine located at a library facility.
